Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2178.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of October 18, 1988 (P.L.756, No.108), known as the Hazardous Sites Cleanup Act, is amended by adding a chapter to read:CHAPTER 6SPILL RESPONSE AND RESIDENTIAL ENVIRONMENTAL PROTECTIONSection 601. Legislative findings and purposes.123456789101112131415161718192021 (a) Findings.--The General Assembly finds and declares as follows:(1) Discharges of hazardous substances, including petroleum and pipeline releases, pose an immediate and serious threat to public health, private drinking water supplies and residential communities in this Commonwealth.(2) Existing State law is not adequate to ensure rapid and mandatory cleanup of active spills in residential areas.(3) Section 27 of Article I of the Constitution of Pennsylvania guarantees the people the right to clean air, pure water and the preservation of the natural, scenic, historic and esthetic values of the environment.(4) In accordance with section 27 of Article I of the Constitution of Pennsylvania, the Commonwealth has a trustee obligation to conserve and maintain public natural resources for the benefit of present and future generations.(b) Purposes.--The purposes of this chapter are to:(1) Establish a clear and enforceable framework for immediate response to discharges of hazardous substances.(2) Require prompt cleanup and removal of contamination that threatens human health or the environment.(3) Authorize the department to act immediately and recover costs from responsible persons.(4) Ensure restoration of environmental conditions consistent with the constitutional rights of the people of this Commonwealth.Section 602. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:20260HB2178PN3142 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "Discharge." The spilling, leaking, pumping, pouring, emitting, emptying, escaping, leaching, dumping or disposing of a hazardous substance into the environment, including soil, groundwater, surface water or indoor air."Hazardous substance." As follows:(1) For purposes of this chapter only, a substance that, when discharged into the environment, presents or may present a threat to public health, safety or the environment, including any of the following:(i) Petroleum, crude oil, gasoline, jet fuel, diesel fuel, fuel oil and petroleum products.(ii) A hazardous substance as defined in 42 U.S.C. § 9601(14) (relating to definitions).(iii) A substance designated as hazardous by a regulation promulgated by the department.(2) The term shall not be construed to expand or modify the definition of hazardous substance or hazardous waste under any other provision of this act."Immediate environmental concern." A condition resulting from a discharge that presents or may present an immediate or substantial threat to human health, safety or the environment, including impacts to residential areas, private drinking water wells, occupied structures or natural resources."Residential area." An area used or zoned for residential purposes, including areas served by public or private drinking water wells."Responsible person." A person who has discharged a hazardous substance or is otherwise responsible for a hazardous substance, including an owner, operator, transporter or a person otherwise liable under this act.20260HB2178PN3142 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 603. Duty to contain, clean up and remove discharges.(a) Immediate actions.--Whenever a discharge of a hazardous substance occurs, a responsible person shall immediately take all actions necessary to contain, clean up and remove the discharge.(b) Strict liability.--A responsible person shall be strictly liable, without regard to fault, for compliance with the duties and requirements imposed under this chapter. If more than one responsible person is liable, the responsible persons shall be jointly and severally liable for compliance with this chapter.(c) Duration.--A responsible person's duty to contain, clean up and remove a discharge shall continue until the department determines that the responsible person has achieved the cleanup standards specified under this chapter.Section 604. Department authority and spill directives.(a) Directives.--To address a discharge, the department may issue a written or oral directive requiring a responsible person to do any of the following:(1) Perform containment, cleanup, removal, investigation or remediation actions specified by the department.(2) Comply with deadlines and other timelines specified by the department for investigation, containment or remediation.(3) Submit sampling data, plans or reports required by the department.(b) Department access and response.--To respond to a discharge, the department may:(1) enter property to conduct response actions; and(2) undertake cleanup and removal when necessary to 20260HB2178PN3142 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 protect public health or the environment.(c) Violation.--A responsible person who fails to comply with a directive issued under this section violates this act.Section 605. Cleanup standards.(a) Constitutional standard.--A responsible person shall conduct cleanup and removal to achieve conditions consistent with section 27 of Article I of the Constitution of Pennsylvania to provide for clean air, pure water and the preservation of the natural, scenic, historic and esthetic values of this Commonwealth's environment.(b) Residential cleanup standard.--If a discharge affects or threatens a residential area, a responsible person shall conduct cleanup and removal to achieve standards for unrestricted residential use, including all of the following:(1) Protect potable groundwater.(2) Prevent exposure through direct contact with contaminated soil.(3) Protect indoor and outdoor air from vapor intrusion.(c) Standards established by regulation.--(1) The board shall promulgate regulations establishing cleanup standards under this chapter. The department shall apply the standards in administering this chapter. The standards shall constitute minimum requirements. The department may not waive a standard unless the department issues a written determination that an alternative provides equal or greater protection.(2) In order to facilitate the prompt implementation of paragraph (1), the board shall promulgate temporary regulations that shall expire no later than two years following the publication of the temporary regulations. The 20260HB2178PN3142 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 board may promulgate temporary regulations not subject to:(i) Section 612 of the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.177, No.175), known as The Administrative Code of 1929.(ii) Sections 201, 202, 203, 204 and 205 of the act of July 31, 1968 (P.L.769, No.240), referred to as the Commonwealth Documents Law.(iii) Sections 204(b) and 301(10) of the act of October 15, 1980 (P.L.950, No.164), known as the Commonwealth Attorneys Act.(iv) The act of June 25, 1982 (P.L.633, No.181), known as the Regulatory Review Act.(3) The board's authority to adopt temporary regulations under paragraph (2) shall expire two years after the effective date of this paragraph. Regulations adopted after this period shall be promulgated as provided by law.(d) Limits on institutional or engineering controls.--A responsible person may not rely on institutional or engineering controls as the sole remedy in a residential area unless the department determines both of the following:(1) Complete removal is infeasible.(2) The controls provide long-term protection consistent with subsection (a).Section 606. Mandatory timelines.(a) Required time frames.--Upon identification of an immediate environmental concern, the department shall require a responsible person to do all of the following:(1) Immediately undertake containment actions.(2) Complete a preliminary site assessment within 30 days.20260HB2178PN3142 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (3) Complete a remedial investigation within 90 days, including the delineation of the nature and extent of contamination.(4) Implement remediation in accordance with a schedule approved by the department.(b) Extensions.--The department may extend a time frame under subsection (a) for good cause based on site conditions. The department shall provide written justification for an extension under this subsection.Section 607. Department cleanup and cost recovery.(a) Department action.--If a responsible person fails to comply with this chapter or a directive issued under section 604, the department may undertake cleanup and removal.(b) Recovery of costs.--A responsible person shall be liable to the Commonwealth for all costs the department incurs under this section, including all of the following:(1) Cleanup and removal costs.(2) Investigation and monitoring costs.(3) Administrative, legal and oversight costs.(4) Costs associated with providing alternative water supplies or other permanent or interim protective measures.(c) Treble damages.--If the department undertakes cleanup and removal under subsection (a) due to a responsible person's failure to comply with a directive issued under section 604, the responsible person shall be liable to the Commonwealth for punitive damages in an amount not to exceed three times the costs incurred.Section 608. Spill response funding and deposits.(a) Use of Hazardous Sites Cleanup Fund.--The department may use the Hazardous Sites Cleanup Fund to pay the costs of 20260HB2178PN3142 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 cleanup, removal, investigation, oversight and emergency response actions undertaken under this chapter.(b) Deposits.--Money collected or recovered by the Commonwealth under this chapter, including amounts recovered under section 607 and civil penalties assessed for violations of this chapter, shall be deposited into the Hazardous Sites Cleanup Fund.(c) Preservation of other remedies.--Nothing in this section shall limit the Commonwealth's authority to pursue other remedies, penalties or damages available under this act or any other State law.Section 609. Public information portal.(a) Establishment.--The department shall establish and maintain an information portal to provide residents with current information regarding a discharge that results in an immediate environmental concern.(b) Contents.--To the extent practicable, the department shall include all of the following information in the portal:(1) The location of the discharge and the area affected, including the residential area the department identifies.(2) A plain-language summary of the nature and extent of contamination known to the department.(3) A summary of response actions the department requires or undertakes under this chapter, including a directive issued under section 604.(4) The status of investigation, cleanup, removal and remediation activities, including a time frame or extension issued under section 606.(5) Information on protective measures the department recommends, including the provision of an alternative water 20260HB2178PN3142 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 supply or other permanent or interim protective measure.(6) Department contact information for complaints, reports and requests for information regarding the discharge.(c) Updates.--The department shall update the portal when the department receives information reflecting a material change in status.Section 610. Relationship to other laws.(a) Supplemental authority.--This chapter shall be construed as supplemental to other provisions of this act. Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to limit the department's authority under this act or any other State law pertaining to the environment.(b) Land Recycling and Environmental Remediation Standards Act.--Compliance with the act of May 19, 1995 (P.L.4, No.2), known as the Land Recycling and Environmental Remediation Standards Act, shall not relieve a responsible person of a duty imposed under this chapter.(c) No liability protection.--Cleanup conducted under this chapter shall not confer liability protection. A responsible person may claim liability protection based solely on cleanup conducted under this chapter only if the department expressly approves the cleanup for that purpose.Section 2. Section 901(c) of the act is amended by adding a paragraph to read:Section 901. Fund.* * *(c) Funds.--Money from the following sources shall be deposited in the fund:* * *(8.1) Money collected or recovered by the Commonwealth 20260HB2178PN3142 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 under Chapter 6.* * *Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2178PN3142 - 10 - 123